Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-312
Boat dealer, defined.

Boat dealer means a person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging boats at retail who has a principal place of business for such purposes in this state.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 12.